West Virginia, session 2026, HB5594.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: article 46A. WEST VIRGINIA CONSUMER CREDIT AND PROTECTION ACT. §46A-9-1. Sale of American flags. No person in the business of offering goods at retail may sell or offer for sale in this state an American flag unless the flag was manufactured in the United States of America.